apertium-ru-uk.uk.dix
<pardef n="відповід/ь__n">
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ь</l>         <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>е</l>         <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>дю</l>        <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ь</l>         <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ей</l>        <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ям</l>        <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ях</l>        <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ями</l>       <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="підмур/ок__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ку</l>        <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ку</l>        <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ок</l>        <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ку</l>        <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ку</l>        <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ком</l>       <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ок</l>        <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ків</l>       <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>кам</l>       <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ки</l>        <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ках</l>       <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ки</l>        <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ками</l>      <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ки</l>        <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="кор/ова__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ови</l>       <r>ова<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ові</l>       <r>ова<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ову</l>       <r>ова<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ові</l>       <r>ова<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ово</l>       <r>ова<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>овою</l>      <r>ова<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ова</l>       <r>ова<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ів</l>        <r>ова<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>овам</l>      <r>ова<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ів</l>        <r>ова<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>овах</l>      <r>ова<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ови</l>       <r>ова<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>овами</l>     <r>ова<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ови</l>       <r>ова<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Січ__n">
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>е</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>чю</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ей</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ам</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ах</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ами</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="гор/но__n">
  <e>       <p><l>на</l>        <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ну</l>        <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>но</l>        <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ні</l>        <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>но</l>        <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ном</l>       <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>но</l>        <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ен</l>        <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>нам</l>       <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>на</l>        <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>нах</l>       <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>на</l>        <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>нами</l>      <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>на</l>        <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="Січ">             <i>Січ</i><par n="Січ__n"/></e>
<e lm="горно">           <i>гор</i><par n="гор/но__n"/></e>
<e lm="підмурок">        <i>підмур</i><par n="підмур/ок__n"/></e>
<e lm="корова">          <i>кор</i><par n="кор/ова__n"/></e>
<e lm="відповідь">       <i>відповід</i><par n="відповід/ь__n"/></e>
